South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3071.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 14-23-1040 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 14-23-1040.  No person is eligible to hold the office of judge of probate who is not at the time of his election: (1) a citizen of the United States and of this State,; (2) has not attained the age of twenty-one years upon his election,; (3) has not become a qualified elector of the county in which he is to be a judge,; and (4) has not received a four-year bachelor'sbachelor of science or arts degree from an accredited post-secondary institution or if he has not received noa four-year bachelor of science or arts degree he must have four years' experience as an employee in a probate judge's office in this State. SECTION 2.  The provisions of this act do not apply to a probate judge currently serving in office on or before the effective date of this act. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----